test/src/gt-desc-yamls/V-lugwma76_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - lugõma: # Verb (76) lugõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     lugõma+V+Inf/mA: lugõma
     lugõma+V+Inf: lukõq
     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc: lugõnuq
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [loet, loetu]

     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: loe
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [loet, loedõq]
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lugõ
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: loemiq
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: loetiq
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lugõvaq
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: loe
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [loi, loie]
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [loit, loiq, loidõq, loiõq, loiõt, loiõdõq]
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lugi
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [loimiq, loiõmiq]
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [loitiq, loiõtiq]
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [loiq, loivaq, loiõq, loiõvaq]

     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: loeda
     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loetas

     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lukõv

     lugõma+V+Jus: lugõguq

     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: loeda
     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [loetat, loetadõq]
     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loetas
     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1: loetamiq
     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2: loetatiq
     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3: loetasõq
     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegII: loeda

     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1: loedi
     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [loetit, loetidõq]
     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3: loeti
     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1: loetimiq
     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2: loetitiq
     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [loediq, loetivaq]

     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lukõv
     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: lugõva
     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: lugõvat
     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: lugõvahe
     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lugõvaq
     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [lugõvidõ, lugõviidõ]
     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [lugõvit, lugõviid]
     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [lugõvihe, lugõviihe]
                    
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: loetav
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: loetava
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: loetavat
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: loetavahe
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: loetavaq
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [loetavidõ, loetaviidõ]
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [loetavit, loetaviid]
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [loetavihe, loetaviihe]

     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: lugõnuq
     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: lugõnu
     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: lugõnut
     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: lugõnuhe
     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: lugõnuq
     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [lugõnuidõ, lugõnuisi]
     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [lugõnuid, lugõnuisi]
     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [lugõnuihe, lugõnuisihe]

     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [loet, loetu]
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: loedu
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: loetut
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: loetuhe
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: loeduq
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [loetuidõ, loetuisi]
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [loetuid, loetuisi]
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [loetuihe, loetuisihe]
